California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) (1) In the event of a covered total loss of a primary dwelling under a residential property insurance policy resulting from a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, if the residence was furnished at the time of the loss, the insurer shall offer a payment under the contents (personal property) coverage in an amount no less than 60 percent of the policy limit applicable to the personal property covered under the policy, up to a maximum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000), without requiring the insured to file an itemized claim.

(2) After receiving the payment described in paragraph (1), the insured may recover additional amounts up to the policy limit for contents coverage by filing a claim pursuant to the terms of the policy for the loss of contents that exceeds the value of the payment provided pursuant to paragraph (1). 

(3) When an insured files a claim relating to a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, the insurer shall notify the insured of the option to receive payment for loss of contents pursuant to paragraph (1) and of the insured’s option to subsequently file a full itemized claim pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) This subdivision does not affect payment under the policy for scheduled personal property.

(5) As a condition of receiving the advance payment made pursuant this subdivision, an insurer may require the insured sign an attestation form. The attesting form may request that the insured acknowledge the residence was furnished and that the insured reasonably believes the personal property damaged or destroyed had a value that equates or exceeded the amount of the advance payment. The attestation form shall not contain any misleading or inaccurate information. The commissioner may issue a bulletin or promulgate a regulation that describes the parameters of an attestation form.

(6) This section does not prohibit an insurer from restricting payment in cases of suspected fraud.

(c) On and after July 1, 2026, all policy forms issued or renewed by an insurer shall
 comply with this section in its entirety, including the changes made to this section by the act that added this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 3.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10104.

(a) As used in this chapter, “policy of residential property insurance” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 10087, except that it shall not include a tenant’s policy, a policy covering individually owned mobilehomes and their contents, a renter’s policy, or a policy insuring individually owned condominium units, when those policies do not provide dwelling structure coverage. If a policy insuring an
 individually owned condominium or an individually owned mobilehome does provide dwelling structure coverage, an insurer is required to provide the named insured with a copy of the documents described in subdivision (a) of Section 10101.

(b) As used in this chapter, “insurer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10091.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 151, Sec. 4.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10105.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to expand, contract, modify, or otherwise affect the coverage provided under any policy of residential property insurance issued and in effect prior to July 1, 1993. The provisions of this chapter shall apply to those policies upon the first renewal of those policies following January 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 11, Sec. 4.   Effective May 5, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10106.

The Insurance Commissioner may modify a disclosure statement as contained in Section 10102, 10103, or 10103.5 only upon request of an insurer. The modification shall only be for the purpose of adding new or clarifying existing language describing any form of dwelling coverage offered by an insurer. The commissioner’s authority to modify the disclosure statement shall be limited solely to determining the clarity and accuracy of the information provided in the disclosure to ensure that the disclosure accurately reflects a new or existing product. It is the intent of
 the Legislature that the disclosure form be kept as brief as clarity and accuracy permit. Any modification to the disclosure statement shall be approved in writing by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10107.

Except as provided in subdivisions (e) and (i) of Section 10102, this chapter shall apply to all policies newly issued on or after July 1, 1993, and to all policies renewed after January 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 11, Sec. 5.   Effective May 5, 1993.   Note: This section prescribes dates of applicability for Chapter 10, commencing with Section 10101.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Small Business Guide to Commercial Insurance [10108. - 10108.1.]

10108.

(a) The commissioner shall develop a pamphlet which provides information to small business owners and others on the key features of, and suggested ways of, purchasing commercial property insurance. The commissioner may develop this pamphlet with the assistance of an advisory panel consisting of persons representing small business owners, insurers, consumer organizations, and other persons deemed necessary by the commissioner.

(b) The pamphlet shall be completed by July 1, 1995, and to the extent feasible, copies shall be made available to persons operating small businesses, business groups, chambers of commerce, and other persons and groups.

(c) The pamphlet shall provide information on the key features of commercial property insurance and recommend steps for purchasing this insurance. The pamphlet shall include, but not be limited to, providing information on the following:

(1) Various types of commercial insurance.

(2) Limits of liability in policies, including that for the following:

(A) Structures.

(B) Personal property.

(C) Inventory.

(D) Business interruption.

(3) Deductibles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 316, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10108.1.

(a) As used in this chapter, “policy of commercial property insurance” has the same meaning as defined in Section 675.5.

(b) As used in this chapter, “insurer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10091.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 316, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. LIFE AND DISABILITY INSURANCE [10110. - 11549.]



  CHAPTER 1. The Contract [10110. - 10198.10.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [10110. - 10127.20.]

10110.

Every person has an insurable interest in the life and health of:

(a) Himself.

(b) Any person on whom he depends wholly or in part for education or support. 

(c) Any person under a legal obligation to him for the payment of money or respecting property or services, of which death or illness might delay or prevent the performance.

(d) Any person upon whose life any estate or interest vested in him depends.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.1.

(a) An insurable interest, with reference to life and disability insurance, is an interest based upon a reasonable expectation of pecuniary advantage through the continued life, health, or bodily safety of another person and consequent loss by reason of that person’s death or disability or a substantial interest engendered by love and affection in the case of individuals closely related by blood or law.

(b) An individual has an unlimited insurable interest in his or her own life, health, and bodily safety and may lawfully take out a policy of insurance on his or her own life, health, or bodily safety and have the policy made payable to whomsoever he or she pleases, regardless of whether the beneficiary designated has an
 insurable interest.

(c) Except as provided in Section 10110.4, an employer has an insurable interest, as referred to in subdivision (a), in the life or physical or mental ability of any of its directors, officers, or employees or the directors, officers, or employees of any of its subsidiaries or any other person whose death or physical or mental disability might cause financial loss to the employer; or, pursuant to any contractual arrangement with any shareholder concerning the reacquisition of shares owned by the shareholder at the time of his or her death or disability, on the life or physical or mental ability of that shareholder for the purpose of carrying out the contractual arrangement; or, pursuant to any contract obligating the employer as part of compensation arrangements or pursuant to a contract obligating the employer as guarantor or surety, on the life of the principal obligor. The trustee of an employer or trustee of a pension,
 welfare benefit plan, or trust established by an employer providing life, health, disability, retirement, or similar benefits to employees and retired employees of the employer or its affiliates and acting in a fiduciary capacity with respect to those employees, retired employees, or their dependents or beneficiaries has an insurable interest in the lives of employees and retired employees for whom those benefits are to be provided. The employer shall obtain the written consent of the individual being insured.

(d) Trusts and special purpose entities that are used to apply for and initiate the issuance of policies of insurance for investors, where one or more beneficiaries of those trusts or special purpose entities do not have an insurable interest in the life of the insured, violate the insurable interest laws and the prohibition against wagering on life.

(e) Any device, scheme,
 or artifice designed to give the appearance of an insurable interest where there is no legitimate insurable interest violates the insurable interest laws.

(f) An insurable interest shall be required to exist at the time the contract of life or disability insurance becomes effective, but need not exist at the time the loss occurs.

(g) Any contract of life or disability insurance procured or caused to be procured upon another individual is void unless the person applying for the insurance has an insurable interest in the individual insured at the time of the application.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (f), and (g), a charitable organization that meets the requirements of Section 214 or 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code may effectuate life or disability insurance on an insured who consents to the issuance
 of that insurance.

(i) This section shall not be interpreted to define all instances in which an insurable interest exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.   (SB 98)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.2.

An insurer shall be entitled to rely upon all statements, declarations, and representations made by an applicant for insurance relative to the insurable interest that the applicant has in the insured, and no insurer shall incur any legal liability except as set forth in the policy, by virtue of any untrue statements, declarations, or representations so relied upon in good faith by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1418, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.3.

(a) An insurer may not issue an individual life insurance policy to an applicant that insures the life of the applicant’s spouse unless the applicant’s spouse has signed the policy application or has otherwise been notified in advance of the issuance of the policy.

(b) This section shall apply to policies of individual life insurance with face amounts exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) that are issued on or after July 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.4.

(a) Except as allowed in subdivision (c), an insurer may not issue or deliver a corporate-owned life insurance policy.

(b) “Corporate-owned life insurance policy” means a life insurance policy that is purchased by a California employer, that designates the employer as the beneficiary of the policy, and that insures the life of a California resident who is a current or former employee of the employer.

(c) This section does not apply to a policy insuring the life of a current or former exempt employee. An exempt employee is an administrative, executive, or professional employee who is exempt under Section 515 of the Labor Code and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (f), it is a violation of public policy for a California employer to purchase or hold a corporate-owned life insurance policy.

(e) (1) A corporate-owned life insurance policy purchased on or after the effective date of this section is void.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (f), a corporate-owned life insurance policy purchased prior to the effective date of this section shall become void on the next premium payment date on or after the date five years from the effective date of this section, but no later than January 1, 2010.

(f) A corporate-owned life insurance policy purchased prior to the effective date of this section that insures the life of a current or former nonexempt employee shall continue in force after the effective date of this section provided that no further premium payments are made after the effective date of this section. However, an employer who has purchased and holds such a corporate-owned life insurance policy shall disclose in writing to the current or former nonexempt employee whose life is insured by the policy, within 90 days of the effective date of this section, all of the following information:

(1) The existence of the corporate-owned life insurance policy on the life of the nonexempt employee.

(2) The identity of the insurer under the policy.

(3) The benefit amount under the policy, unless the full amount of the benefit is used to defray the costs of nonexempt employee benefits.

(4) How benefits paid under the policy would be used.

(5) The name of the beneficiary under the policy.

(g) For a former employee, the disclosure requirements shall be deemed satisfied if the employer mails the required information to the former employee’s last known address.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 328, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.5.

(a) A policy or endorsement issued by an admitted life and disability insurer may contain a provision for a waiver of premium payments in the event of involuntary unemployment of the insured. Insurers issuing policies or endorsements containing that provision shall establish any additional reserves and file any additional financial reports that the commissioner may require.

(b) A contract or supplemental contract issued by an admitted life and disability insurer may contain a provision for a waiver of surrender charge benefit for a life insurance or annuity contract in the event of voluntary or involuntary unemployment of the owner, insured, or annuitant, as applicable. Insurers issuing contracts or supplemental contracts
 containing that provision shall establish any additional reserves and file any additional financial reports that the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.6.

(a) If a policy, contract, certificate, or agreement offered, issued, delivered, or renewed, whether or not in California, that provides or funds life insurance or disability insurance coverage for any California resident contains a provision that reserves discretionary authority to the insurer, or an agent of the insurer, to determine eligibility for benefits or coverage, to interpret the terms of the policy, contract, certificate, or agreement, or to provide standards of interpretation or review that are inconsistent with the laws of this state, that provision is void and unenforceable.

(b) For purposes of this section, “renewed” means continued in force on or after the
 policy’s anniversary date.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “discretionary authority” means a policy provision that has the effect of conferring discretion on an insurer or other claim administrator to determine entitlement to benefits or interpret policy language that, in turn, could lead to a deferential standard of review by any reviewing court.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits an insurer from including a provision in a contract that informs an insured that as part of its routine operations the insurer applies the terms of its contracts for making decisions, including making determinations regarding eligibility, receipt of benefits and claims, or explaining policies, procedures, and processes, so long as the provision could not give rise to a deferential standard of review by any reviewing court. 

(e) This section applies to both group and individual products.

(f) The commissioner may adopt regulations reasonably necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

(g) This section is self-executing. If a life insurance or disability insurance policy, contract, certificate, or agreement contains a provision rendered void and unenforceable by this section, the parties to the policy, contract, certificate, or agreement and the courts shall treat that provision as void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   (SB 621)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.7.

(a) This section, except for subdivision (i), applies to a disability insurance policy that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, excluding a specialized health insurance policy and a policy that provides excepted benefits as described in Sections 2722 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-21) and 2791 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-91) of the federal Public Health Service Act, subject to Section 10198.61.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a disability insurance policy shall cover the costs for COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing and health care services related to the diagnostic and screening testing approved or granted emergency use authorization by the federal Food and Drug Administration for COVID-19, regardless of whether the services are provided
 by an in-network or out-of-network provider. Coverage required by this section shall not be subject to copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other form of cost sharing. Services related to COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing include, but are not limited to, hospital or health care provider office visits for the purposes of receiving testing, products related to testing, the administration of testing, and items and services furnished to an insured as part of testing. Services related to COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing do not include bonus payments for the use of specialized equipment or expedited processing.

(1) To the extent a health care provider would have been entitled to receive cost sharing but for this section, the insurer shall reimburse the health care provider the amount of that lost cost sharing.

(2) A disability insurance policy shall not impose
 prior authorization or any other utilization management requirements on COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing.

(3) With respect to an insured, a health insurer shall reimburse the provider of the testing according to either of the following:

(A) If the health insurer has a specifically negotiated rate for COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing with such provider in effect before the public health emergency declared under Section 319 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 247d), such negotiated rate shall apply throughout the period of such declaration.

(B) If the health insurer does not have a specifically negotiated rate for COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing with such provider, the insurer may negotiate a rate with such provider.

(4) For an out-of-network provider with whom an insurer does not have a specifically negotiated rate for COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing and health care services related to testing, an insurer shall reimburse the provider for all testing items or services in an amount that is reasonable, as determined in comparison to prevailing market rates for testing items or services in the geographic region where the item or service is rendered. An out-of-network provider shall accept this payment as payment in full, shall not seek additional remuneration from an insured for services related to testing, and shall not report adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency or commence civil action against the insured.

(5) Beginning six months
 after the federal public health emergency expires, an insurer shall no longer be required to cover the cost sharing for COVID-19 diagnostic and screening testing and health care services related to testing when delivered by an out-of-network provider, except as otherwise required by law. All other requirements of this subdivision shall remain in effect after the federal public health emergency expires.

(c) (1) A disability insurance policy shall cover without cost sharing any item, service, or immunization that is intended to prevent or mitigate COVID-19 and that is either of the following with respect to the individual insured:

(A) An evidence-based item or service that had in
 effect on January 1, 2025, a rating of “A” or “B” in the
 recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
 Force or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) An immunization that
 as of January 1, 2025, had in effect a recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code, regardless of whether the immunization is recommended for routine use.

(2) The items, services, and immunizations described in paragraph (1) that were in effect as of January 1, 2025, shall be covered upon the enactment of the act that added this paragraph.

(3) Any modification or supplement to the recommendations described in paragraph (1) shall be covered no later
 than 15 business days after the date on which the State Department of Public Health publishes the updated recommendations pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) To the extent a health care provider would have been entitled to receive cost sharing but for this section, the insurer shall reimburse the health care provider the amount of that lost cost sharing.

(5) (A) A disability insurance policy subject to this subdivision shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements, including a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible, for any item, service, or immunization described in paragraph (1), regardless of whether such service is delivered by an in-network or out-of-network provider.

(B) A disability insurance policy shall not impose cost sharing for any items or services that are necessary for the furnishing of an item, service, or immunization described in paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, provider office visits and vaccine
 administration, regardless of whether the service is delivered by an in-network or out-of-network provider.

(C) With respect to an insured, a health insurer shall reimburse the provider of the immunization according to either of the following:

(i) If the health insurer has a negotiated rate with such provider in effect before the public health emergency declared under Section 319 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 247d), such negotiated rate shall apply throughout the period of such declaration.

(ii) If the health insurer does not have a negotiated rate with such provider, the insurer may negotiate a rate with such provider.

(D) For an out-of-network provider with whom a disability insurer does not have a negotiated rate for an item,
 service, or immunization described in paragraph (1), an insurer shall reimburse the provider for all such items or services, including any items or services that are necessary for the furnishing of an item, service, or immunization described in paragraph (1), in an amount that is reasonable, as determined in comparison to prevailing market rates for such items or services in the geographic region in which the item or service is rendered. An out-of-network provider shall accept this payment as payment in full, shall not seek additional remuneration from an insured, and shall not report adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency or commence civil action against the insured for items, services, and immunizations described in paragraph (1), including any items or services that are necessary for the furnishing of an item, service, or immunization described in paragraph (1).

(E) Beginning six months after the federal public health
 emergency expires, an insurer shall no longer be required to cover the cost sharing for any item, service, or immunization described in paragraph (1) and to cover any items or services that are necessary for the furnishing of the items, services, or immunizations described in paragraph (1) when delivered by an out-of-network provider, except as otherwise required by law. All other requirements of this section shall remain in effect after the federal public health emergency expires.

(6) A disability insurer subject to this subdivision shall not impose prior authorization or any other utilization management requirements on any item, service, or immunization described in
 paragraph (1) or to items or services that are necessary for the furnishing of the items, services, or immunizations described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph
 (5).

(d) The commissioner may issue guidance to insurers regarding compliance with this section. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care in issuing the guidance specified in this subdivision.

(e) This section, excluding subdivision (i), shall apply retroactively beginning from the Governor’s declared State of Emergency related to the SARS-CoV-2 (COVID-19) pandemic on March 4, 2020.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Diagnostic testing” means all of the following:

(A) Testing intended to identify current or past infection and performed when a person has signs or symptoms consistent with COVID-19, or when a person is asymptomatic but has recent known or suspected exposure to SARS-CoV-2.

(B) Testing a person with symptoms consistent with COVID-19.

(C) Testing a person as a result of contact tracing efforts.

(D) Testing a person who indicates that they were exposed to someone with a confirmed or suspected case of COVID-19.

(E) Testing a person after an individualized clinical assessment by a licensed health care provider.

(2) “Screening testing” means tests that are intended to identify
 people with COVID-19 who are asymptomatic and do not have known, suspected, or reported exposure to SARS-CoV-2. Screening testing helps to identify unknown cases so that measures can be taken to prevent further transmission. Screening testing includes all of the following:

(A) Workers in a workplace setting.

(B) Pupils, faculty, and staff in a school setting.

(C) A person before or after travel.

(D) At home for someone who does not have symptoms associated with COVID-19 and does not have a known exposure to someone with COVID-19.

(g) This section does not relieve an insurer from continuing to cover testing as required by federal law and guidance.

(h) The department shall hold insurers accountable for timely access to services required under this section and coverage requirements established under federal law, regulations, or guidelines.

(i) (1) This subdivision applies to a disability insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after the operative date of this subdivision that covers hospital, medical, surgical, or prescription drug benefits, excluding a specialized health insurance policy that provides coverage only for dental or vision benefits, with respect to therapeutics for COVID-19 covered under the policy, which shall include therapeutics approved or granted emergency use authorization by the federal Food and
 Drug Administration for treatment of COVID-19 when prescribed or furnished by a licensed health care provider acting within their scope of practice and the standard of care.

(2) A disability insurer shall reimburse a provider for the therapeutics described in paragraph (1) at the specifically negotiated rate for those therapeutics, if the insurer and provider have negotiated a rate. If the insurer does not have a negotiated rate with a provider, the insurer may negotiate a rate with the provider.

(3) For an out-of-network provider with whom a disability insurer does not have a negotiated rate for the therapeutics described in paragraph (1), a disability insurer shall reimburse the provider for the therapeutics in an amount that is reasonable, as determined in comparison to prevailing market rates for the therapeutics in the geographic region in which the therapeutic was delivered.
 An out-of-network provider shall accept this payment as payment in full, shall not seek additional remuneration from an insured, and shall not report adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency or commence civil action against the insured for therapeutics described in this subdivision.

(4) A disability insurer shall cover COVID-19 therapeutics without cost sharing, regardless of whether the therapeutics are provided by an in-network or out-of-network provider, and without utilization management. If a provider would have been entitled to receive cost sharing but for this section, the disability insurer shall reimburse the provider for the amount of that lost cost sharing. A provider shall accept this payment as payment in full, shall not seek additional remuneration from an insured, and shall not report adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency or commence civil action against the insured for therapeutics pursuant
 to this subdivision.

(5) Beginning six months after the federal public health emergency expires, a disability insurer shall no longer be required to cover the cost sharing for COVID-19 therapeutics delivered by an out-of-network provider, unless otherwise required by law. All other requirements of this subdivision shall remain in effect after the federal public health emergency expires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 43.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.75.

(a) This section applies to a disability insurance policy that provides coverage for hospital, medical, surgical, or prescription drug benefits, excluding a specialized health insurance policy that provides coverage only for dental or vision benefits.

(b) (1) A disability insurance policy shall cover, without cost sharing and without prior authorization or other utilization management requirements, the costs of the following health care services to prevent or mitigate a disease when the Governor of the State of California has declared a public health emergency due to that disease:

(A) An item or service that, as of January 1, 2025, had in effect a rating of “A” or “B” in the recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force, or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) An immunization that, as of January 1, 2025, had in effect a recommendation of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and
 Prevention, or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A health care service or product related to diagnostic and screening testing for the disease that is approved or granted emergency use authorization by the federal Food and Drug Administration, or is recommended by the State Department of Public Health or the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(D) Therapeutics
 approved or granted emergency use authorization by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the disease.

(2) The items, services, and immunizations described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) that were in effect as of January 1, 2025, shall be covered upon enactment of the act that amended this section.

(3) Any modification or supplement to the recommendations described in subparagraphs (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) that is adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code shall be covered no later than 15 business days after the date on which the State Department of Public Health publishes the updated schedule pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The item, service, or immunization covered pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be covered no later than 15 business days after the date on which the United States Preventive Services Task
 Force, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American Academy of Family Physicians or the State Department of Public Health makes a recommendation relating to the item, service, or immunization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 44.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.8.

(a) A life or disability insurance policy other than health insurance, as defined in Section 106, issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2020, shall not do any of the following based solely and without any additional actuarial risks upon the status of a person as a living organ donor:

(1) Refuse to insure, or refuse to continue to insure, the person under a life or disability insurance policy.

(2) Limit the amount, extent, or kind of coverage available to the person under a life or disability insurance policy.

(3) Charge the person a different rate for the same coverage under a life or
 disability insurance policy.

(4) Otherwise discriminate in the offering, issuance, cancellation, amount of coverage, price, or any other condition of a life or disability insurance policy for the person.

(b) With respect to any health condition other than being a living organ donor, a person who is a living organ donor shall be subject to the same standards of sound actuarial principles or actual or reasonably anticipated experience as persons who are not living organ donors.

(c) For purposes of this section, “living organ donor” means an individual who has donated all or part of an organ and is not deceased.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 316, Sec. 4.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in Section 10144.56,
 on and after January 1, 2028, a health insurer or its
 delegate shall subscribe to and use the most recent version of the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare (CAQH) credentialing form, and shall comply with the CAQH credentialing processes.

 (b) A health insurer or its delegate shall only
 request additional information from a provider to clarify and confirm information that is provided on the
 CAQH credentialing form, including verification of information not specifically disclosed on the provider’s application. The provider shall respond to the request within 10 business days. A health insurer or its delegate shall minimize the number of requests for additional information from providers. A provider shall submit their credentialing form and maintain their credentialing information in the CAQH database in a manner consistent with CAQH standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.   (AB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10111.

In life or disability insurance, the only measure of liability and damage is the sum or sums payable in the manner and at the times as provided in the policy to the person entitled thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

10111.2.

(a) Under a policy of disability insurance other than health insurance, as defined in Section 106, including a policy of disability income insurance, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 799.01, payment of benefits to the insured shall be made within 30 calendar days after the insurer has received all information needed to determine liability for a claim. However, the 30-calendar-day period shall not include any time during which the insurer is doing any of the following:

(1) Awaiting a response for relevant medical information from a health care provider.

(2) Awaiting a response from the claimant to a request for additional
 relevant information.

(3) Investigating possible fraud that has been reported to the department’s Fraud Division in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 1872.4.

(b) If the insurer has not received all information needed to determine liability for a claim within 30 calendar days after receipt of the claim, the insurer shall notify the insured in writing and include a written list of all information it reasonably needs to determine liability for the claim. In that event, the 30-calendar-day period set out in subdivision (a) shall commence when the insured has provided to the insurer all information in that notification. If no notice is sent by the insurer within 30 calendar days after the claim is filed by the insured, interest shall begin to accrue on the payment of
 benefits on the 31st calendar day after receipt of the claim, at the rate of 10 percent per year.

(c) When the insurer has received all information needed to determine liability for a claim, and the insurer determines that liability exists and fails to make payment of benefits to the insured within 30 calendar days after the insurer has received that information, any delayed payment shall bear interest, beginning the 31st calendar day, at the rate of 10 percent per year. Liability shall, in all cases, be determined by the insurer within 30 calendar days of receiving all information set out in the insurer’s written notification to the insured.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to restrict any other remedies available to an insured by statute or any other
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 25.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10111.5.

An insurer shall not be liable for payments claimed under an individual or group policy of life insurance if the duty to make those payments depends upon a factual determination of whether the death of the insured was an accident or a suicide and that fact cannot be established without an autopsy and the autopsy is prohibited under Section 27491.43 of the Government Code. Insurers refusing or delaying payments in those circumstances in good faith shall not be liable for exemplary or punitive damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1731, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10111.7.
